en: redcurrant, red currant
bg: червен касис, френско грозде
cs: červený rybíz, červené rybízy, červeného rybízu
da: røde bær, ribs
de: rote Johannisbeere, rote Johannisbeeren, roten Johannisbeeren, rote Johannesbeeren
el: κόκκινα φραγκοστάφυλα
es: grosella roja, grosellas rojas
et: punase sõstra
fi: Punaherukka, punaherukkaa
fr: groseille, groseilles, groseilles rouges
hr: crveni ribiz
hu: piros ribiszke
it: ribes rosso
lt: raudonųjų serbentų
lv: sarkanajām jāņogām
mt: passolina ħamra
nl: aalbes, rode bes, rode bessen, aalbessen
pl: czerwona porzeczka, czerwonej porzeczki, czerwonych porzeczek, porzeczki czerwone, czerwone porzeczki
pt: groselha, groselhas vermelhas
ro: coacaze rosii, coacăzelor roșii
ru: красная смородина
sk: červené ríbezle
sl: rdeči ribez
sv: röda vinbär

en: red currant juice
de: roter Johannisbeersaft, Johannisbeersaft rot, roter Johannisbeerensaft, Johannisbeerensaft rot
it: succo di ribes rosso

en: whitecurrant, white currant
fr: groseille blanche, groseilles blanches
it: ribes bianco

en: rose hip, rosehip, rosehips
af: Roosbottel
ar: وردة المسك
az: İtburnu
be: Шыпшына
bg: Шипка, шипки, плод шипка
br: Hogan
bs: Šipurak
ca: gavarró
cs: šípek, šípky, šípků
cv: Шăлан
da: Hyben
de: Hagebutte, Hagebutten
el: καρπός της αγριοτριανταφυλλιάς, κυνόρροδα
eo: Rozbero
es: escaramujo, agavanzos
et: koer-kibuvitsa
eu: Arkakarats
fa: میوه گل رز
fi: Ruusunmarja, kiulukka, ruusunmarjaa
fr: cynorrhodon, fruit de l'églantier, cynorhodons
ga: mogóir róis
hr: šipak, šipak plod, plod šipka, plodovi šipka, šipka
hu: csipkebogyó
hy: մասուր
it: Cinorrodo, cinorrodi
ja: ローズヒップ
jv: Rosehip
kk: Итмұрын
ko: 로즈힙
ky: Ит мурун
lb: Spackelter
lt: erškėtuogė, Erškėtis, erškėtuogių
lv: mežrožu
ml: റോസ് ഹിപ്
nb: Nype
nl: Rozenbottel, rozebottel, rozenbottels
nn: Nype
os: Уагъылы
pt: Cinórrodo
ro: Măceș, măceșelor
ru: Шиповник
sk: šípka, Ruža šipkova, šípky
sl: šipek
sv: Nypon
tr: kuşburnu
uk: Шипшина
zh: 蔷薇果

en: dog rose
de: Hundsrose
fr: églantier
hr: rosa canina L
it: Rosa canina
la: Rosa canina
pl: dzika róża, dzikiej róży
pt: roseira brava

en: dog rose fruit
it: frutto di rosa canina
pl: owoc dzikiej róży

en: rowal
la: Pangium edule

en: strawberry, strawberries
an: Fraga
ar: فراولة
as: ষ্ট্ৰবেৰী
az: Bağ çiyələyi
be: Суніцы садовыя
bg: ягода, ягоди
bn: স্ট্রবেরি
bo: འབྲི་ཏ་ས་འཛིན།
br: Sivi
ca: maduixa, maduixes
cs: jahoda, jahody, Jahodník velkoplodý
da: jordbær, Havejordbær
de: Erdbeere, Erdbeeren
el: Φράουλα, φράουλα, φράουλες
eo: frago
es: fresa, frutilla
et: Aedmaasikas
eu: Baratze-marrubi
fa: توت‌فرنگی
fi: mansikka, mansikat
fo: Jarðber
fr: fraise
gl: Amorodo
gn: Yvapytã
gu: સ્ટ્રોબેરી
he: תות, תותים
hi: स्ट्रॉबेरी
hr: jagoda, jagode, od jagode
hu: Eper
hy: Ելակ
id: Stroberi kebun
io: Frago
it: fragola, fragole
ja: イチゴ, いちご
jv: Strobèri kebon
km: ស្ត្របឺរី
kn: ಸ್ಟ್ರಾಬೆರಿ
ko: 딸기
lo: ໝາກຟະແລດ
lt: Braškė
lv: Dārza zemene
mk: Јагода
ml: ഗാർഡൻ സ്ട്രോബെറി
mn: Цэцэрлэгийн гүзээлзгэнэ
mr: स्ट्रॉबेरी
mt: frawla
my: စတော်ဘယ်ရီ
nb: jordbær, hagejordbær
ne: स्ट्रबेरी
nl: aardbei, aardbeien
nn: Hagejordbær
nv: Dah woozh
pa: ਸਟਰਾਬਰੀ
pl: Truskawka, truskawki, truskawek, truskawkowy, truskawkowego, truskawkowa, truskawkowej, truskawkowe, truskawkowych, owoc truskawki, owoce truskawki
pt: morango, morangos
ro: căpșună
ru: клубника
sa: तृणबदरफलम्
sd: اسٽرا بيري
sq: luleshtrydhe
sv: jordgubbe, jordgubb, jordgubbar, jordgubbs
sw: Mstroberi
ta: செம்புற்று
tg: Қулфинай
th: สตรอว์เบอร์รี
ug: بۆلجۈرگەن
uk: Суниці садові
ur: تُوت علیق
vi: Dâu tây vườn
za: Godumh
zh: 草莓

en: strawberry filling
bg: ягодов пълнеж, пълнеж от ягоди
de: Erdbeerfüllung
fi: mansikkatäyte
hr: nadjev od jagoda
it: ripieno di fragole
pl: nadzienie truskawkowe, wsad truskawkowy, nadzienie o smaku truskawkowym

en: strawberry preparation
fr: préparation de fraise
hr: pripravak od jagoda, pripravak od jagode
it: preparazione di fragole

en: strawberry juice
bg: ягодов сок, сок от ягоди
de: Erdbeersaft
es: zumo de fresa, jugo de fresa
fi: mansikkamehu
fr: jus de fraise
hr: sok od jagoda
hu: eperlé
it: Succo di fragola
ja: 苺ジュース, イチゴジュース, いちごジュース, 苺果汁, イチゴ果汁, いちご果汁
nl: aardbeiensap
pl: sok truskawkowy, sok z truskawki, sok z truskawek
pt: Suco de morango, sumo de morango
sv: jordgubbssaft, jordgubbsjuice, jordgubbjuice

en: strawberry juice concentrate, concentrated strawberry juice
de: erdbeersaftkonzentrat
es: Concentrado de zumo de fresa, concentrado de jugo de fresa
fi: mansikkamehutiiviste, mansikkatäysmehutiiviste
fr: concentré de jus de fraise
hr: koncentrat soka od jagode
it: Succo concentrato di fragola
nl: Aardbeien sap concentraat
pl: koncentrat soku truskawkowego, zagęszczony sok z truskawki

en: strawberry juice from concentrate
bg: сок от ягода от концентрат
de: Erdbeersaft aus Konzentrat, Erdbeersaft aus Erdbeersaftkonzentrat, Erdbeersaft aus Fruchtsaftkonzentrat
fi: mansikkamehu tiivisteestä, tiivisteestä valmistettu mansikkatäysmehu
fr: jus de fraise à base de concentré
hr: sok od jagode iz koncentrata
it: succo di fragola da concentrato
nl: geconcentreerd aardbeiensap
pl: sok truskawkowy z koncentratu, sok truskawkowy z zagęszczonego soku truskawkowego, sok truskawkowy z zagęszczonego soku, sok truskawkowy z soku zagęszczonego

en: strawberry puree
bg: пюре от ягоди
de: Erdbeerpüree
es: puré de fresa
fi: mansikkapyree, mansikkasose, mansikkapyre
fr: purée de fraise, purée de fraises
hr: pire od jagoda
hu: eperpüré
it: purea di fragola
nb: jordbærpuré
nl: aardbeienpuree
nn: jordbærpuré
pl: przecier truskawkowy, przecier z truskawek, puree truskawkowe
pt: Puré de morango
ru: Клубничное пюре, пюре клубничное
sv: jordgubbspuré

en: concentrated strawberry puree
de: Erdbeerpüree aus Konzentrat
es: puré de fresa concentrado
fi: tiivistetty mansikkapyree
fr: purée de fraise concentrée, puree de fraise concentree, purée de fraise å base de concentré
hr: koncentrirani pire od jagoda
it: purea di fragole concentrata

en: strawberry powder
de: Erdbeerpulver
et: maasikapulber
fi: mansikkajauhe
fr: poudre de fraise
hr: jagoda u prahu
it: polvere di fragole
pl: proszek truskawkowy
ro: pudră de căpșuni

en: wild strawberry, woodland strawberry, alpine strawberry, carpathian strawberry, fragaria vesca
bg: диви ягоди
da: skovjordbær
de: wald-erdbeere, walderdbeeren, wald-edbeeren
et: metsmaasikas
fi: ahomansikka, metsämansikka
fr: fraise des bois, fraises des bois
hr: divlja Jagoda
hu: erdei szamóca
is: villijarðarber
it: fragola di bosco, fragole di bosco
la: fragaria vesca
nb: markjordbær
nl: bosaardbei
nn: markjordbær
pl: poziomka, poziomki, poziomkowy

en: sea-buckthorn, sea-buckthorns
ar: أبو فايس
az: murdarçayabənzər çaytikanı
ba: һырғанаҡ
be: абляпіха крушынападобная
bg: облепиха, зърнастец
ca: arç groc
cs: rakytník řešetlákový, rakytníku
da: havtorn
de: sanddorn
el: ιπποφαές
eo: ramnoida hipofeo
es: uva espina
et: astelpaju, harilik astelpaju
fa: سنجد تلخ
fi: tyrni, tyrniä
fr: argousier
gl: espiñeiro marítimo
gv: bugogue varrey
hr: pasji trn
hu: európai homoktövis, homoktövis
hy: չիչխան սովորական
it: olivello spinoso
kk: шырғанақ
ky: сары чычырканак
lt: dygliuotasis šaltalankis
lv: pabērzu smiltsērkšķis
nb: tindved
ne: मलो
nl: duindoorn
nn: tindved
pl: rokitnik zwyczajny, rokitnik pospolity, rokitnik, rokitnika
ps: اکبار
pt: espinheira das areias
ro: cătină albă, crușin
ru: облепиха крушиновидная
sk: Hippophae rhamonides
sl: navadni rakitovec, krhlike
sr: пасји трн
sv: havtorn
tg: ангат
uk: обліпиха звичайна
zh: 沙棘

en: sea-buckthorn juice
de: Sanddornsaft
fi: tyrnimehu, tyrnitäysmehu
fr: Jus d'argousier
hr: sok od morske krkavine
sv: havtornsjuice

en: tamarillo
bg: тамарило, дървесен картоф
de: Tamarillo, Baumtomate
fr: tamarillo
hr: tamarillo
it: tamarillo